District of Columbia statutes.
16-4004

Collaborative law participation agreement; requirements.

(a)

A collaborative law participation agreement shall:

(1)

Be in a record;

(2)

Be signed by the parties;

(3)

State the parties’ intention to resolve a collaborative matter through a collaborative law process under this chapter;

(4)

Describe the nature and scope of the matter;

(5)

Identify the collaborative lawyer who represents each party in the process; and

(6)

Contain a statement by each collaborative lawyer confirming the lawyer’s representation of a party in the collaborative law process.

(b)

The parties may agree to include in a collaborative law participation agreement additional provisions not inconsistent with this chapter.

History

May 9, 2012, D.C. Law 19-125, § 2(b), 59 DCR 1928

Section References

This section is referenced in § 16-4003 and § 16-4020.

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 4 of the Uniform Collaborative Law Act.